Indiana, session 2026, SB141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-4.7-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A quarterly
monthly listing of telephone numbers of Indiana consumers who
request not to be solicited by telephone shall be established,
maintained, and published as provided in this section.
(b) The telephone number of a consumer shall be placed on the
listing if the consumer requests to be added to the listing according to
a procedure approved by the division.
(c) The listing shall be updated upon receipt of a request from a
consumer.
(d) A telephone solicitor may obtain a copy of the listing upon
request of the telephone solicitor as provided in this section.
(e) The division shall establish a fee to be paid by a telephone
solicitor for obtaining a copy of the listing. The fee established under
this subsection may not exceed the amount necessary to cover the cost
of providing the listing to telephone solicitors.
SECTION 2. IC 24-4.7-4-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
2026 IN 141—LS 6456/DI 154


FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A telephone solicitor
may not make or cause to be made a telephone sales call to a telephone
number if that telephone number appears in the most current quarterly
monthly listing published by the division.
SECTION 3. IC 24-4.7-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does not apply to the sale,
transfer, or provision of a consumer's telephone number to a person that
is exempt from this article under IC 24-4.7-1-1.
(b) A telephone solicitor, a supplier, or a caller may not sell,
transfer, or make available to another person for solicitation purposes
a consumer's telephone number if the telephone solicitor, supplier, or
caller knows that the telephone number appears in the most current
quarterly monthly listing published by the division.
(c) A telephone solicitor, a supplier, or a caller may not transfer a
live call to one (1) or more other persons if the call has been placed to
a consumer in violation of this article or IC 24-5-14.
(d) A telephone solicitor, a supplier, or a caller may not provide
substantial assistance or support to another person if the telephone
solicitor, supplier, or caller knows or consciously avoids knowing that
the person has engaged in any act or practice that violates this article
or IC 24-5-14.
(e) A person may not provide substantial assistance or support to a
telephone solicitor, a supplier, or a caller if the person knows or
consciously avoids knowing that the telephone solicitor, supplier, or
caller has engaged in any act or practice that violates this article or
IC 24-5-14. A communications service provider (as defined in
IC 8-1-32.5-4) does not violate this subsection, and this subsection
does not:
(1) provide a right of action against a communications service
provider; or
(2) subject a communications service provider to any criminal
penalties or civil remedies set forth in this article or in
IC 24-5-14;
if the communications service provider's equipment or services are
used only to transport, handle, or retransmit a communication that
violates this article or IC 24-5-14.
SECTION 4. IC 24-4.7-5-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. An action brought
under this chapter may not be brought more than two (2) five (5) years
after the occurrence of the deceptive act.
2026 IN 141—LS 6456/DI 154